Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.001

Board of prison terms and paroles redesignated as indeterminate sentence review board.

On July 1, 1986, the board of prison terms and paroles shall be redesignated the indeterminate sentence review board. The newly designated board shall retain the same membership and staff as the previously designated board of prison terms and paroles. References to "the board" or "board of prison terms and paroles" contained in this chapter, chapters 7.68, 9.95, 9.96, 71.06, and 72.04A RCW, and RCW 9A.44.045 and 72.68.031 are deemed to refer to the indeterminate sentence review board.

[ 1986 c 224 s 2; (i) 1935 c 114 s 1; RRS s 10249-1. (ii) 1947 c 47 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 10249-1a. Formerly RCW 43.67.010.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1986 c 224: "Sections 1 through 13 of this act shall take effect July 1, 1986." [ 1986 c 224 s 16.]

Severability—1986 c 224: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1986 c 224 s 17.]